Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.100

Treatment of county held tax-title property.

All property deeded to the county under the provisions of this chapter shall be treated as follows during the period the property is so held:

(1) The property shall be:

(a) Stricken from the tax rolls as county property;

(b) Exempt from taxation;

(c) Exempt from special assessments except as provided in chapter 35.49 RCW and RCW 35.44.140 and 79.44.190; and

(d) Exempt from property owner association dues or fees.

(2) The sale, management, and leasing of tax title property shall be handled as under chapter 36.35 RCW.

[ 2007 c 295 s 3; 1998 c 106 s 13; 1961 c 15 s 84.64.220. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 130 s 131; RRS s 11292; prior: 1899 c 141 s 27. Formerly RCW 84.64.220.]